Washington statutes.
RCW 36.94.900

Declaration of purpose.

This chapter is hereby declared to be necessary for the public peace, health, safety and welfare and declared to be a county purpose and that the bonds and special assessments authorized hereby are found to be for a public purpose.

[ 1967 c 72 s 33.]